District of Columbia statutes.
2-1393

Establishment of the Commission on African Affairs.

There is established a Commission on African Affairs (“Commission”) to advise the Mayor, the Council, the Director of the Office on African Affairs, and the public on the views and needs of the African communities in the District.

June 8, 2006, D.C. Law 16-111, § 4, 53 DCR 2532

History

This section is referenced in § 1-523.01.

Section References